Vermont, session 2025-2026, S2.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 5003 is amended to read:
§ 5003. DUTIES OF EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF RACIAL EQUITY
(a) The Executive Director of Racial Equity (Director) shall work with the
agencies and departments to implement a program of continuing coordination
and improvement of activities in State government in order to combat systemic
racial disparities and measure progress toward fair and impartial governance,
including:
(1) overseeing a comprehensive organizational review to identify
systemic racism in each of the three branches of State government and
inventory systems in place that engender racial disparities;
VT LEG #378256 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.2
2025 Page 2 of 5
(2) managing and overseeing the statewide collection of race-based data
to determine the nature and scope of racial discrimination within all systems of
State government; and
(3) developing a model fairness and diversity policy and reviewing and
making recommendations regarding the fairness and diversity policies held by
all State government systems; and
(4) temporarily overseeing the establishment of the Health Equity
Advisory Commission established pursuant to 18 V.S.A. § 252 until the Office
of Health Equity is established.
* * *
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 252 is amended to read:
§ 252. HEALTH EQUITY ADVISORY COMMISSION
* * *
(c) Powers and duties. The Advisory Commission shall:
(1) provide guidance on the development of the Office of Health Equity,
which shall be established based on the Advisory Commission’s
recommendations not later than January 1, 2023, including on:
(A) the structure, responsibilities, and jurisdiction of the Office;
(B) whether the Office shall be independent and, if not, in which
State agency or department it shall be situated;
(C) how the Office shall be staffed;
VT LEG #378256 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.2
2025 Page 3 of 5
(D) the populations served and specific issues addressed by the
Office;
(E) the duties of the Office, including how grant funds shall be
managed and distributed; and
(F) the time frame and necessary steps to establish the Office;
(2) provide advice and make recommendations to the Office of Health
Equity once established, including input on:
(A) any rules or policies proposed by the Office;
(B) the awarding of grants and the development of programs and
services;
(C) the needs, priorities, programs, and policies relating to the health
of individuals who are Black, Indigenous, and Persons of Color; individuals
who are LGBTQ; and individuals with disabilities; and
(D) any other issue on which the Office of Health Equity requests
assistance from the Advisory Commission;
(3) review, monitor, and advise all State agencies regarding the impact
of current and emerging State policies, procedures, practices, laws, and rules
on the health of individuals who are Black, Indigenous, and Persons of Color;
individuals who are LGBTQ; and individuals with disabilities;
(4) identify and examine the limitations and problems associated with
existing laws, rules, programs, and services related to the health status of
VT LEG #378256 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.2
2025 Page 4 of 5
individuals who are Black, Indigenous, and Persons of Color; individuals who
are LGBTQ; and individuals with disabilities;
(5) advise the Department of Health and the General Assembly on any
funding decisions relating to eliminating health disparities and promoting
health equity, including the distribution of federal monies related to COVID-
19;
(6) to the extent funds are available for the purpose, distribute grants
that stimulate the development of community-based and neighborhood-based
projects that will improve the health outcomes of individuals who are Black,
Indigenous, and Persons of Color; individuals who are LGBTQ; and
individuals with disabilities; and
(7) advise the General Assembly on efforts to improve cultural
competency, cultural humility, and antiracism in the health care system
through training and continuing education requirements for health care
providers and other clinical professionals.
* * *
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 254 is added to read:
§ 254. OFFICE OF HEALTH EQUITY
(a) There is established the Office of Health Equity within the Department
of Health for the purpose of eliminating avoidable and unjust disparities in
health among Vermonters. The Office shall use a systemic and comprehensive
VT LEG #378256 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.2
2025 Page 5 of 5
approach that addresses those social, economic, and environmental factors that
influence health outcomes.
(b) The Office of Health Equity shall be directed by an Executive Director,
an individual who shall be qualified by reason of education, expertise, and
experience and who may have a professional degree in public health, social or
environmental justice, or a related field. The Executive Director shall serve on
a full-time basis and shall be exempt from classified service.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #378256 v.1